Massachusetts, session 194th, S939.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 15A of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 46. (a) Subject to appropriation, there shall be a hunger-free campus grant
program managed by the department to provide grants to institutions of public higher education
to address student food insecurity and hunger in order to support students in completion of their
career and technical education at the post-secondary level with the goal of enhancing the
workforce of the commonwealth. This grant program shall also be available to municipally
administered colleges and to minority-serving institutions as defined under 20 U.S.C. 1067k (3)
as determined by the United States Department of Education. Funding for the grant program may
of 4

include, but not be limited to, appropriations from the Education and Transportation Fund
established in section 2BBBBBB of chapter 29.
Using funding allocated under the grant program, the department is authorized to hire a
director of the program who shall report to the commissioner. The director shall develop
guidelines and procedures governing the grant making process and the program using available
data pertaining to student hunger. The director may also conduct any additional surveys the
department deems necessary to understand gaps in addressing student food insecurity and hunger
eligible higher education campuses across the commonwealth.
The guidelines and procedures that govern the program shall specify any requirements
applicable to eligible institutions of higher education including, but not limited to: (i) whether the
institution has designated campus staff to interface with the department; (ii) the existence and
extent of any campus-level hunger awareness programs, including notification to students of
their rights to participate in federal and state food assistance programs; (iii) whether the
institution has established on-campus meal vendors to accept available federal and state nutrition
benefits; (iv) the existence or development of a student meal credit sharing program; (v) income
based standards by which grant levels are determined according to the student population at each
participating campus; and (vi) any other pertinent criteria as developed by the department. The
department shall further develop and deliver technical assistance to assist eligible institutions of
higher education to meet the goals of this program.
(b) Subject to appropriation, the department shall award grants to institutions that have
met the guidelines and procedures established by the department. Upon recommendation by the
director of the program, the
of 4

commissioner or a designee shall determine the amount of each grant which shall be used
by the institution to address food insecurity among its students in accordance with the program
and shall establish reporting guidelines for grant recipients.
(c) Annually, not later than July 1, the department shall submit a report on the hunger-
free campus grant program for the preceding fiscal year to the governor, the clerks of the senate
and house of representatives and the joint committee on higher education. The report shall
include the number and amounts of grants to eligible institutions well as a comprehensive
assessment of the program for the applicable year, including: (i) identifying the institutions
participating in the program; (ii) describing the activities of participating campuses; (iii) the level
of student engagement in activities; and (iv) the outcomes resulting from activities.
(d) There shall be established and set up on the books of the commonwealth a separate
fund to be known as the Hunger-Free Campus Trust Fund administered by the commissioner of
higher education. The fund shall be credited with: (i) revenue from appropriations or other
money authorized by the general court and specifically designated to be credited to the fund; (ii)
interest earned on such revenues; and (iii) funds from public and private sources such as gifts,
grants and donations. Amounts credited to the fund shall not be subject to further appropriation
and any money remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the General
Fund. Amounts credited to the fund shall be used to fund grants made pursuant to the program,
and for the cost of administration of such program by the department of higher education.
(e) Annually, not later than October 1, the commissioner shall report to the clerks of the
senate and house of representatives, the joint committee on higher education and the house and
senate committees on ways and means on the fund's activity including: (i) the source and amount
of 4

of funds received; (ii) the amounts distributed and the purpose of expenditures from the fund;
(iii) any grants provided to institutions of higher education and other stakeholder organizations;
and (iv) anticipated revenue and expenditure projections for the next year.
of 4